California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
Where the variance is not material, as provided in Section 469 the court may direct the fact to be found according to the evidence, or may order an immediate amendment, without costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 540, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

471.

Where, however, the allegation of the claim or defense to which the proof is directed, is unproved, not in some particular or particulars only, but in its general scope and meaning, it is not to be deemed a case of variance, within the meaning of Sections 469 and 470, but a failure of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 540, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

471.5.

(a) If the complaint is amended, a copy of the amendments shall be filed, or the court may, in its discretion, require the complaint as amended to be filed, and a copy of the amendments or amended complaint must be served upon the defendants affected thereby. The defendant shall answer the amendments, or the complaint as amended, within 30 days after service thereof, or such other time as the court may direct, and judgment by default may be entered upon failure to answer, as in other cases. For the purposes of this subdivision, “complaint” includes a cross-complaint, and “defendant” includes a person against whom a cross-complaint is filed.

(b) If the answer is amended, the adverse party has 10 days after service thereof, or such other time as the court may direct, in which to demur to the amended answer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

472.

(a) A party may amend its pleading once without leave of the court at any time before the answer, demurrer, or motion to strike is filed, or after a demurrer or motion to strike is filed but before the demurrer or motion to strike is heard if the amended pleading is filed and served no later than the date for filing an opposition to the demurrer or motion to strike. A party may amend the pleading after the date for filing an opposition to the demurrer or motion to strike, upon stipulation by the parties. The time for responding to an amended pleading shall be computed from the date of service of the amended pleading.

(b) This section shall not apply to a special motion brought pursuant
 to Section 425.16.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 273, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 19.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

472a.

(a) A demurrer is not waived by an answer filed at the same time.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by rule adopted by the Judicial Council, if a demurrer to a complaint or to a cross-complaint is overruled and there is no answer filed, the court shall allow an answer to be filed upon such terms as may be just. If a demurrer to the answer is overruled, the action shall proceed as if no demurrer had been interposed, and the facts alleged in the answer shall be considered as denied to the extent mentioned in Section 431.20.

(c) Subject to the limitations imposed by subdivision (e) of Section 430.41, if a demurrer is
 sustained, the court may grant leave to amend the pleading upon any terms as may be just and shall fix the time within which the amendment or amended pleading shall be filed. If a demurrer is stricken pursuant to Section 436 and there is no answer filed, the court shall allow an answer to be filed on terms that are just.

(d) If a motion to strike is granted pursuant to Section 436, the court may order that an amendment or amended pleading be filed upon terms it deems proper. If a motion to strike a complaint or cross-complaint, or portion thereof, is denied, the court shall allow the party filing the motion to strike to file an answer.

(e) If a motion to dismiss an action pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 583.210) of Chapter 1.5 of Title 8 is denied, the court shall
 allow a pleading to be filed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 418, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 20.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

472b.

When a demurrer to any pleading is sustained or overruled, and time to amend or answer is given, the time so given runs from the service of notice of the decision or order, unless the notice is waived in open court, and the waiver entered in the minutes. When an order sustaining a demurrer without leave to amend is reversed or otherwise remanded by any order issued by a reviewing court, any amended complaint shall be filed within 30 days after the clerk of the reviewing court mails notice of the issuance of the remittitur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

472c.

(a) When any court makes an order sustaining a demurrer without leave to amend the question as to whether or not such court abused its discretion in making such an order is open on appeal even though no request to amend such pleading was made.

(b) The following orders shall be deemed open on appeal where an amended pleading is filed after the court’s order:

(1) An order sustaining a demurrer to a cause of action
 within a complaint or cross-complaint where the order did not sustain the demurrer as to the entire complaint or cross-complaint.

(2) An order sustaining a demurrer to an affirmative defense within an answer where the order sustaining the demurrer did not sustain the demurrer as to the entire answer.

(3) An order granting a motion to strike a portion of a pleading where the order granting the motion to strike did not strike the entire pleading.

(c) As used in this section, “open on appeal” means that a party aggrieved by an order listed in subdivision (b) may claim the order as error in an appeal from the final judgment in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 456, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

472d.

Whenever a demurrer in any action or proceeding is sustained, the court shall include in its decision or order a statement of the specific ground or grounds upon which the decision or order is based which may be by reference to appropriate pages and paragraphs of the demurrer.

The party against whom a demurrer has been sustained may waive these requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 727.)
-------------------------------------------

473.

(a) (1) The court may, in furtherance of justice, and on any terms as may be proper, allow a party to amend any pleading or proceeding by adding or striking out the name of any party, or by correcting a mistake in the name of a party, or a mistake in any other respect; and may, upon like terms, enlarge the time for answer or demurrer. The court may likewise, in its discretion, after notice to the adverse party, allow, upon any terms as may be just, an amendment to any pleading or proceeding in other particulars; and may upon like terms allow an answer to be made after the time limited by this code.

(2) When it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the amendment renders it necessary, the court may postpone the trial, and may, when the
 postponement will by the amendment be rendered necessary, require, as a condition to the amendment, the payment to the adverse party of any costs as may be just.

(b) The court may, upon any terms as may be just, relieve a party or the party’s legal representative from a judgment, dismissal, order, or other proceeding taken against the party through the party’s mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. Application for this relief shall be accompanied by a copy of the answer or other pleading proposed to be filed therein, otherwise the application shall not be granted, and shall be made within a reasonable time, in no case exceeding six months, after the judgment, dismissal, order, or proceeding was taken. However, in the case of a judgment, dismissal, order, or other proceeding determining the ownership or right to possession of real or personal property, without extending the six-month period, when a notice in writing is personally
 served within the State of California both upon the party against whom the judgment, dismissal, order, or other proceeding has been taken, and upon the party’s attorney of record, if any, notifying that party and the party’s attorney of record, if any, that the order, judgment, dismissal, or other proceeding was taken against the party and that any rights the party has to apply for relief under the provisions of Section 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall expire 90 days after service of the notice, then the application shall be made within 90 days after service of the notice upon the defaulting party or the party’s attorney of record, if any, whichever service shall be later. No affidavit or declaration of merits shall be required of the moving party. Notwithstanding any other requirements of this section, the court shall, whenever an application for relief is made no more than six months after entry of judgment, is in proper form, and is accompanied by an attorney’s sworn affidavit attesting to the
 attorney’s mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or neglect, vacate any (1) resulting default entered by the clerk against the attorney’s client, and which will result in entry of a default judgment, or (2) resulting default judgment or dismissal entered against the attorney’s client, unless the court finds that the default or dismissal was not in fact caused by the attorney’s mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or neglect. The court shall, whenever relief is granted based on an attorney’s affidavit of fault, direct the attorney to pay reasonable compensatory legal fees and costs to opposing counsel or parties. However, this section shall not lengthen the time within which an action shall be brought to trial pursuant to Section 583.310.

(c) (1) Whenever the court grants relief from a default, default judgment, or dismissal based on any of the provisions of this section, the court may do any of the following:

(A) Impose a penalty of no greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon an offending attorney or party.

(B) Direct that an offending attorney pay an amount no greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000) to the State Bar Client Security Fund.

(C) Grant other relief as is appropriate.

(2) However, where the court grants relief from a default or default judgment pursuant to this section based upon the affidavit of the defaulting party’s attorney attesting to the attorney’s mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or neglect, the relief shall not be made conditional upon the attorney’s payment of compensatory legal fees or costs or monetary penalties imposed by the court or upon compliance with other sanctions ordered by the court.

(d) The court may, upon motion of the injured party, or its own motion, correct clerical mistakes in its judgment or orders as entered, so as to conform to the judgment or order directed, and may, on motion of either party after notice to the other party, set aside any void judgment or order.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 12.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 13 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

473.

(a) (1) The court may, in furtherance of justice, and on any terms as may be proper, allow a party to amend any pleading or proceeding by adding or striking out the name of any party, or by correcting a mistake in the name of a party, or a mistake in any other respect; and may, upon like terms, enlarge the time for answer or demurrer. The court may likewise, in its discretion, after notice to the adverse party, allow, upon any terms as may be just, an amendment to any pleading or proceeding in other particulars; and may upon like terms allow an answer to be made after the time limited by this code.

(2) When it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the amendment renders it necessary, the court may postpone the trial,
 and may, when the postponement will by the amendment be rendered necessary, require, as a condition to the amendment, the payment to the adverse party of any costs as may be just.

(b) The court may, upon any terms as may be just, relieve a party or the party’s legal representative from a judgment, dismissal, order, or other proceeding taken against the party through the party’s mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. Application for this relief shall be accompanied by a copy of the answer or other pleading proposed to be filed therein, otherwise the application shall not be granted, and shall be made within a reasonable time, in no case exceeding six months, after the judgment, dismissal, order, or proceeding was taken. However, in the case of a judgment, dismissal, order, or other proceeding determining the ownership or right to possession of real or personal property, without extending the six-month period, when a notice in
 writing is personally served within the State of California both upon the party against whom the judgment, dismissal, order, or other proceeding has been taken, and upon the party’s attorney of record, if any, notifying that party and the party’s attorney of record, if any, that the order, judgment, dismissal, or other proceeding was taken against the party and that any rights the party has to apply for relief under the provisions of Section 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall expire 90 days after service of the notice, then the application shall be made within 90 days after service of the notice upon the defaulting party or the party’s attorney of record, if any, whichever service shall be later. No affidavit or declaration of merits shall be required of the moving party. Notwithstanding any other requirements of this section, the court shall, whenever an application for relief is made no more than six months after entry of judgment, is in proper form, and is accompanied by an attorney’s sworn
 affidavit attesting to the attorney’s mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or neglect, vacate any (1) resulting default entered by the clerk against the attorney’s client, and which will result in entry of a default judgment, or (2) resulting default judgment or dismissal entered against the attorney’s client, unless the court finds that the default or dismissal was not in fact caused by the attorney’s mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or neglect. The court shall, whenever relief is granted based on an attorney’s affidavit of fault, direct the attorney to pay reasonable compensatory legal fees and costs to opposing counsel or parties. However, this section shall not lengthen the time within which an action shall be brought to trial pursuant to Section 583.310.

(c) (1) Whenever the court grants relief from a default, default judgment, or dismissal based on any of the provisions of this section, the court may do any of the
 following:

(A) Impose a penalty of no greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon an offending attorney or party.

(B) Direct that an offending attorney pay an amount no greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000) to the State Bar Client Security Fund.

(C) Grant other relief as is appropriate.

(2) However, where the court grants relief from a default or default judgment pursuant to this section based upon the affidavit of the defaulting party’s attorney attesting to the attorney’s mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or neglect, the relief shall not be made conditional upon the attorney’s payment of compensatory legal fees or costs or monetary penalties imposed by the court or upon compliance with other sanctions ordered by the court.

(d) The court may, upon motion of the injured party, or its own motion, correct clerical mistakes in its judgment or orders as entered, so as to conform to the judgment or order directed, and may, on motion of either party after notice to the other party, set aside any void judgment or order.

(e) Notwithstanding any other requirements of this section, a party to an action may bring a motion to vacate a default judgment that is void for lack of proper service at any time after entry of the judgment.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 13.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

473.1.

The court may, upon such terms as may be just, relieve a party from a judgment, order, or other proceeding taken against him or her, including dismissal of an action pursuant to Section 581 or Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 583.110) of Title 8, where a court of this state has assumed jurisdiction, pursuant to Section 6180 or 6190 of the Business and Professions Code, over the law practice of the attorney for the party and the judgment, order or other proceeding was taken against the party after the application for the court to assume jurisdiction over the
 practice was filed. Application for this relief shall be made within a reasonable period of time, in no case exceeding six months, after the court takes jurisdiction over the practice. However, in the case of a judgment, order, or other proceeding determining the ownership or right to possession of real or personal property, without extending the six-month period, when a notice in writing is personally served within the state both upon the party against whom the judgment, order, or other proceeding has been taken, and upon the attorney appointed pursuant to Section 6180.5 of the Business and Professions Code to act under the court’s direction, notifying the party and the appointed attorney that the order, judgment, or other proceeding was taken against him or her and that any rights the party has to apply for relief under the provisions of the section shall expire 90 days after service of notice, then application for relief must be made within 90 days after service of the notice upon the defaulting party or
 the attorney appointed to act under the court’s direction pursuant to Section 6180.5 of the Business and Professions Code, whichever service is later. No affidavit or declaration of merits shall be required of the moving party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

473.2.

(a) A party that was not served with a summons and complaint in accordance with this chapter may file and serve a motion to set aside or vacate the default or default judgment and for leave to defend the action or to move for dismissal.

(b) (1) A party moving to set aside or vacate a default or a default judgment pursuant to subdivision (a) shall proffer evidence, through a sworn affidavit or otherwise, that service was not lawfully effected. Proffering evidence that service was not lawfully effected rebuts a presumption of the facts stated in the process server’s return.

(2) If a process server files their return before the operative date of this section, the
 absence of the photograph required by Section 417.10 shall not by itself render the proof of service unlawful or insufficient.

(c) In responding to a motion that is filed pursuant to this section and that complies with subdivision (b), the party seeking a default or default judgment has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that service of the summons and complaint was lawful.

(d) In deciding a motion filed pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall take evidence as to the lawfulness of the service of process and shall not deny a reasonable request by either party to conduct a hearing and permit oral testimony.

(e) This section does not limit any other remedies available under law.

(f) This section shall become operative on January
 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 14.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

473.5.

(a) When service of a summons has not resulted in actual notice to a party in time to defend the action and a default or default judgment has been entered against the party in the action, the party may serve and file a notice of motion to set aside the default or default judgment and for leave to defend the action. The notice of motion shall be served and filed within a reasonable time, but in no event exceeding the earlier of: (i) two years after entry of a default judgment against the party; or (ii) 180 days after service on the party of a written notice that the default or default judgment has been entered.

(b) A notice of motion to set aside a default or default judgment and for leave to defend the action shall
 designate as the time for making the motion a date prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 1005, and it shall be accompanied by an affidavit showing under oath that the party’s lack of actual notice in time to defend the action was not caused by the party’s avoidance of service or inexcusable neglect. The party shall serve and file with the notice a copy of the answer, motion, or other pleading proposed to be filed in the action.

(c) Upon a finding by the court that the motion was made within the period permitted by subdivision (a) and that the party’s lack of actual notice in time to defend the action was not caused by the party’s avoidance of service or inexcusable neglect, it may set aside the default or default judgment on whatever terms as may be just and allow the party to defend the action.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that
 date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 15.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 16 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

473.5.

(a) When service of a summons was lawfully effected but has not resulted in actual notice to a party in time to defend the action and a default or default judgment has been entered against the party in the action, the party may serve and file a notice of motion to set aside the default or default judgment and for leave to defend the action. The notice of motion shall be served and filed within a reasonable time, but in no event exceeding the earlier of: (i) two years after entry of a default judgment against the party; or (ii) 180 days after service on the party of a written notice that the default or default judgment has been entered.

(b) A notice of motion to set aside a default or default judgment
 and for leave to defend the action shall designate as the time for making the motion a date prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 1005, and it shall be accompanied by an affidavit showing under oath that the party’s lack of actual notice in time to defend the action was not caused by the party’s avoidance of service or inexcusable neglect. The party shall serve and file with the notice a copy of the answer, motion, or other pleading proposed to be filed in the action.

(c) Upon a finding by the court that the motion was made within the period permitted by subdivision (a) and that the party’s lack of actual notice in time to defend the action was not caused by the party’s avoidance of service or inexcusable neglect, it may set aside the default or default judgment on whatever terms as may be just and allow the party to defend the action.

(d) This section shall become operative on
 January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 16.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

474.

When the plaintiff is ignorant of the name of a defendant, he must state that fact in the complaint, or the affidavit if the action is commenced by affidavit, and such defendant may be designated in any pleading or proceeding by any name, and when his true name is discovered, the pleading or proceeding must be amended accordingly; provided, that no default or default judgment shall be entered against a defendant so designated, unless it appears that the copy of the summons or other process, or, if there be no summons or process, the copy of the first pleading or notice served upon such defendant bore on the face thereof a notice stating in substance: “To the person served: You
 are hereby served in the within action (or proceedings) as (or on behalf of) the person sued under the fictitious name of (designating it).” The certificate or affidavit of service must state the fictitious name under which such defendant was served and the fact that notice of identity was given by endorsement upon the document served as required by this section. The foregoing requirements for entry of a default or default judgment shall be applicable only as to fictitious names designated pursuant to this section and not in the event the plaintiff has sued the defendant by an erroneous name and shall not be applicable to entry of a default or default judgment based upon service, in the manner otherwise provided by law, of an amended pleading, process or notice designating defendant by his true name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

475.

The court must, in every stage of an action, disregard any error, improper ruling, instruction, or defect, in the pleadings or proceedings which, in the opinion of said court, does not affect the substantial rights of the parties. No judgment, decision, or decree shall be reversed or affected by reason of any error, ruling, instruction, or defect, unless it shall appear from the record that such error, ruling, instruction, or defect was prejudicial, and also that by reason of such error, ruling, instruction, or defect, the said party complaining or appealing sustained and suffered substantial injury, and that a different result would have been probable if such error, ruling,
 instruction, or defect had not occurred or existed. There shall be no presumption that error is prejudicial, or that injury was done if error is shown.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1897, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 6.5. ATTACHMENT [481.010. - 493.060.]



  CHAPTER 1. Words and Phrases Defined [481.010. - 481.225.]

481.010.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.020.

“Account debtor” means “account debtor” as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 11.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

481.030.

“Account receivable” means “account” as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

481.040.

“Chattel paper” means “chattel paper” as defined in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 12.1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

481.055.

“Costs” means costs and disbursements, including, but not limited to, statutory fees, charges, commissions, and expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 5.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

481.060.

“Complaint” includes a cross-complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.070.

“Defendant” includes a cross-defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.080.

“Deposit account” means “deposit account” as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 12.2.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

481.090.

“Document of title” means “document” as defined in paragraph (30) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. A document of title is negotiable if it is negotiable within the meaning of Section 7104 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 12.3.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

481.100.

“Equipment” means tangible personal property in the possession of the defendant and used or bought for use primarily in the defendant’s trade, business, or profession if it is not included in the definitions of inventory or farm products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.110.

“Farm products” means crops or livestock or supplies used or produced in farming operations or products of crops or livestock in their unmanufactured states (such as ginned cotton, wool clip, maple syrup, milk, and eggs), while in the possession of a defendant engaged in raising, fattening, grazing, or other farming operations. If tangible personal property is a farm product, it is neither equipment nor inventory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 8.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

481.113.

“Financial institution” means a state or national bank, state or federal savings and loan association or credit union, or like organization, and includes a corporation engaged in a safe deposit business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 9.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

481.115.

“General intangibles” means “general intangibles,” as defined in paragraph (42) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, consisting of rights to payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

481.117.

“Instrument” means “instrument” as defined in paragraph (47) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 13.1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

481.120.

“Inventory” means tangible personal property in the possession of a defendant that (a) is held by the defendant for sale or lease or to be furnished under contracts of service or (b) is raw materials, work in process, or materials used or consumed in his trade, business, or profession. Inventory of a person is not to be classified as his equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.140.

“Levying officer” means the sheriff or marshal who is directed to execute a writ or order issued under this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

481.170.

“Person” includes a natural person, a corporation, a partnership or other unincorporated association, a limited liability company, and a public entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

481.175.

“Personal property” includes both tangible and intangible personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 15.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

481.180.

“Plaintiff” means a person who files a complaint or cross-complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.190.

A claim has “probable validity” where it is more likely than not that the plaintiff will obtain a judgment against the defendant on that claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.195.

“Property” includes real and personal property and any interest therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 16.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

481.200.

“Public entity” includes the state, the Regents of the University of California, a county, a city, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.203.

“Real property” includes any right in real property, including, but not limited to, a leasehold interest in real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 17.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

481.205.

“Registered process server” means a person registered as a process server pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22350) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 18.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

481.207.

“Secured party” means “secured party” as defined in paragraph (73) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 2.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

481.210.

“Security” means a “security” as defined by Section 8102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

481.220.

“Security agreement” means a “security agreement” as defined by paragraph (74) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 3.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

481.223.

“Security interest” means “security interest” as defined in Section 1201 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 20.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

481.225.

“Tangible personal property” includes chattel paper, documents of title, instruments, securities, and money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 21.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [482.010. - 482.120.]

482.010.

This title shall be known and may be cited as “The Attachment Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

482.020.

Nothing in this title precludes the granting of relief pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

482.030.

(a) The Judicial Council may provide by rule for the practice and procedure in proceedings under this title.

(b) The Judicial Council shall prescribe the form of the applications, notices, orders, and other documents required by this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

482.040.

The facts stated in each affidavit filed pursuant to this title shall be set forth with particularity. Except where matters are specifically permitted by this title to be shown by information and belief, each affidavit shall show affirmatively that the affiant, if sworn as a witness, can testify competently to the facts stated therein. As to matters shown by information and belief, the affidavit shall state the facts on which the affiant’s belief is based, showing the nature of his information and the reliability of his informant. The affiant may be any person, whether or not a party to the action, who has knowledge of the facts. A verified complaint that satisfies the
 requirements of this section may be used in lieu of or in addition to an affidavit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

482.050.

(a) If the plaintiff so requests in writing at the time he files his complaint, the clerk of the court with whom the complaint is filed shall not make available to the public the records and documents in such action before either (1) 30 days after the filing of the complaint or (2) the filing pursuant to this title of the return of service of the notice of hearing and any temporary protective order, or of the writ of attachment if issued without notice, whichever event occurs first.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the clerk of the court
 shall make the entire file in the action available for inspection at any time to any party named in the complaint or to his attorney.

(c) The request by plaintiff that the fact of filing of a complaint or application for relief not be made public may take the form of a notation to that effect, made by rubber stamp or other suitable means, at the top of the first page of the complaint filed with the clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

482.060.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the judicial duties to be performed under this title are subordinate judicial duties within the meaning of Section 22 of Article VI of the California Constitution and may be performed by appointed officers such as court commissioners.

(b) The judicial duties to be performed in the determination of the following matters are not subordinate judicial duties:

(1) A contested claim of exemption.

(2) A contested motion for determination of the liability and damages for wrongful attachment.

(3) A contested third-party claim.

(4) A contested proceeding to enforce a third person’s liability.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (b) limits the power of a court to appoint a temporary judge pursuant to Section 21 of Article VI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 23.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

482.070.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, legal process required or permitted to be served under this title may be served personally or by mail.

(2) For purposes of this title, the term “legal process” shall refer to each and all of the writs, notices, orders, or other papers required or permitted to be
 served pursuant to this title.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, service of legal process under this title is governed by Article 1 (commencing with Section 684.010) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 684.110) of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 9, including the provisions of Section 684.120 extending time when service is made by mail.

(c) For the purpose of subdivision (b), in Article 1 (commencing with Section 684.010) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 684.110) of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 9:

(1) References to the “judgment debtor” shall be deemed references to the defendant.

(2) References to the “judgment creditor” shall be deemed references to the plaintiff.
